Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 3 Regulatory Powers of Administration
39-3-17.
Procedure for obtaining authority for security issues.

The proceedings for obtaining the consent and authority of the division for the security issue as provided in §§

39-3-15

—

39-3-23

shall be as follows:

In case the stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness are to be issued for money only, the public utility shall file with the division a statement, signed and verified by the president and secretary thereof, setting forth:

The amount and character of the stocks, bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness;

The purposes for which they are to be issued;

The terms upon which they are to be issued;

The total assets and liabilities of the public utility in such detail as the division may require;

If the issue is desired for the purpose of reimbursement of money expended from income, as herein provided, the amount expended, when and for what purposes expended; and

Such other facts and information pertinent to the inquiry as the division may require.

If the stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness are to be issued, partly, or wholly for property or services or other consideration than money, the public utility shall file with the division a statement, signed and verified by its president and secretary, setting forth:

The amount and character of the stocks, bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness proposed to be issued;

The purposes for which they are to be issued;

The description and value of the property or services for which they are to be issued;

The terms on which they are to be issued or exchanged;

The amount of money, if any, to be received from the same in addition to the property, service, or other consideration;

The total assets and liabilities of the public utility in such detail as the division may require; and

Such other facts and information pertinent to the inquiry as the division may require.

For the purpose of enabling the division to determine whether it should issue the order, it shall hold such hearings, make such inquiries or investigations, and examine such witnesses, books, papers, documents, and contracts as it may deem proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-17

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 106; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 4.

39-3-18.
Order of division as to security issue.

The order of the division shall fix the amount, character, and terms of any issue, and the purposes to which the issue or any proceeds thereof shall be applied, and recite that the money, property, consideration, or labor procured or to be procured or paid for by the issue has been, or is reasonably required for the purposes specified in the order, and the value of any property, consideration, or service as the case may be, as found by the division, for which, in whole or in part, the issue is proposed to be made. No public utility shall, without the consent of the division, apply any issue or its proceeds to any purpose not specified in the order.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-18

.

39-3-19.
Unauthorized securities.

All stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness, payable at periods of more than twelve (12) months after the date of issue thereof, issued by any public utility after April 30, 1936, without the consent or permission of the division, as provided in this chapter, shall be void and of no effect.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-19

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 106.

39-3-20.
Securities of foreign utilities.

No foreign public utility corporation shall be required to apply to the division for authority to issue stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-20

.

39-3-21.
Penalty for false statements.

Any director, president, secretary, manager, officer, or other official of any public utility who shall knowingly make any false statement to secure the issue of any stock, bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, or who shall, by such false statement, procure the order of the division for the issue of any stock, bond, note, or other evidence of indebtedness, or issue with knowledge of fraud, negotiate, or cause to be negotiated, any stock, bond, or other evidence of indebtedness in violation of §§

39-3-15

—

39-3-23

shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned in the adult correctional institutions for not less than one year nor more than ten (10) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-21

.

39-3-22.
Security dividends — Distribution of proceeds of securities.

No public utility shall declare any stock, bond, or scrip dividend or divide the proceeds of the sale of any stock, bond, or scrip among its stockholders without the consent and permission of the division.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-22

; P.L. 1966, ch. 83, § 1.

39-3-23.
Charters amended — Availability of information.

The charters of all corporations subject to regulation by the division as public utilities are hereby amended to the extent necessary to comply with the provisions of §§

39-3-15

—

39-3-22

as amended; provided, however, that all information acquired under the provisions of the sections shall be available to the governor and to all members of the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 62; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-23

; P.L. 1966, ch. 83, § 2.

39-3-24.
Transactions between utilities for which approval required.

With the consent and approval of the division, but not otherwise:

Any two (2) or more public utilities doing business in the same municipality or locality within this state, or any two (2) or more public utilities whose lines intersect or parallel each other within this state, or furnish a like service or product within this state, may enter into contracts with each other that will enable the public utilities to operate their lines or plants in connection with each other.

Any public utility may purchase or lease all or any part of the property, assets, plant, and business of any other public utility or merge with any other public utility, and in connection therewith may exercise and enjoy all of the rights, powers, easements, privileges, and franchises theretofore exercised and enjoyed by any other public utility with respect to the property, assets, plant, and business so purchased, leased, or merged.

Any public utility may merge with any other public utility or sell or lease all or any part of its property, assets, plant, and business to any other public utility, provided that the merger or a sale or lease of all or substantially all of its property, assets, plant, and business shall be authorized by a vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) in interest of its stockholders at a meeting duly called for the purpose. Any stockholder who shall not have voted in favor of the merger, sale, or lease, either in person or by proxy, shall be entitled to the rights, and the corporation shall be subject to the duties, obligations, and liabilities set forth in §§

7-1.2-1201

and

7-1.2-1202

with respect to dissenting stockholders and to corporations that sell, lease, or exchange their entire assets respectively.

Any public utility may directly or indirectly purchase the stock of any other public utility.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 63; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 59; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-24

; P.L. 1985, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 24; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 24; P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 2.

39-3-25.
Proceedings for approval of transactions between utilities.

The proceedings for obtaining the consent and approval of the division for such authority shall be as follows: There shall be filed with the division a petition, joint or otherwise, as the case may be, signed and verified by the president and secretary of the respective companies clearly setting forth the object and purposes desired; stating whether or not it is for the purchase, sale, lease, or making of contracts or for any other purpose in §

39-3-24

provided; and also the terms and conditions of the same. The division shall upon the filing of the petition, if it deem a hearing necessary, fix a time and place for the hearing thereof. If, after the hearing, or, in case no hearing is required, the division is satisfied that the prayer of the petition should be granted; that the facilities for furnishing service to the public will not thereby be diminished; and that the purchase, sale, or lease and the terms thereof are consistent with the public interest, it shall make such order in the premises as it may deem proper and the circumstances may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 63; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 59; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-25

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 106.

39-3-26.
Charters amended to authorize approved transactions.

The charters of all corporations subject to regulation by the division are hereby amended to the extent necessary to authorize the carrying out of any agreement, merger, purchase, sale, or lease approved by the division as provided in §§

39-3-24

and

39-3-25

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 63; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 59; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-26

; P.L. 1999, ch. 247, § 1.

39-3-27.
Definitions.

“Affiliate” means and includes the following:

Every person owning or holding, directly or indirectly, ten percent (10%) or more of the voting capital stock of a public utility.

Any corporation, voluntary association, or trust, ten percent (10%) or more of the voting capital stock of which is owned or controlled directly or indirectly by a person owning or controlling directly or indirectly ten percent (10%) or more of the voting capital stock of a public utility.

Any person with whom a public utility has a management or service contract or arrangement of the character set forth in §

39-3-28

, including contracts for personal services with persons not otherwise affiliated.

“Person” means and includes individuals, corporations, trustees, lessees, holders of beneficial equitable title, voluntary associations, receivers, and partnerships.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-27

.

39-3-28.
Filing of agreements with affiliates.

The original or a verified copy of any contract or arrangement and of any modification thereof or a verified summary of any unwritten contract or arrangement, the consideration of which exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), hereafter entered into between a public utility and an affiliate providing for the furnishing of managerial, supervisory, construction, engineering, accounting, purchasing, financial, or any other services, either to or by a public utility or an affiliate, shall be filed by the public utility with the division within ten (10) days after the date on which the contract is executed or the arrangement entered into. The division may also require a public utility to file in such form as the division may require full information with respect to any purchase from or sale to an affiliate, whether or not made in pursuance of a continuing contract or arrangement.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-28

; P.L. 1997, ch. 142, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 18, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 31, § 2.

39-3-29.
Effect of failure to file agreements.

Any contract or arrangement not filed with the division pursuant to §

39-3-28

shall be unenforceable in any court in this state, and payments thereunder may be disallowed by the division, unless the later filing thereof is approved in writing by the division.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-29

.

39-3-30.
Investigation and order as to transaction between affiliates.

The division shall have full power and authority to investigate any contract, arrangement, purchase, or sale, and if the division, after notice and hearing, shall find the contract, arrangement, purchase, or sale to be unjust or unreasonable, the division may make such reasonable order relating thereto as the public good requires. In any such investigation, the burden shall be on the public utility or affiliate to prove the reasonableness of any contract, arrangement, purchase, or sale with, from, or to an affiliate. If the public utility shall fail to satisfy the division of the reasonableness of any contract, arrangement, purchase, or sale, the division may disapprove the same, or disallow payments thereunder or the part of any payment as the division shall find to be unjust or unreasonable, or both disapprove and disallow as aforesaid. No payment disallowed by the division shall be capitalized or included as an operating cost of the public utility in the fixing of rates or as an asset in fixing a rate base. If, in any investigation, the public utility or affiliate shall unreasonably refuse to comply with any request of the division for information with respect to relevant accounts and records, whether of the public utility or any affiliate, any portion of which may be applicable to any transaction under investigation, so that parts thereof as the division may deem material may be made part of the record, the refusal shall justify the division in disapproving the transaction under investigation and disallowing payments in pursuance thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-30

.

39-3-31.
Court order to cease practice impairing service.

If, as a result of an investigation in accordance with §

39-3-30

, the division shall find that any public utility is making any payment or about to make any payment or doing or about to do any other thing that substantially threatens or impairs the ability of the public utility to render adequate service, at reasonable rates, or otherwise to discharge its duty to the public, the division may apply to the superior court for an order directing the public utility to cease making any payment or doing any other thing, and thereupon the court shall make such order as the public good may require.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-31

.

39-3-32.
Disallowance of payments to affiliates in rate proceedings.

In any proceeding, whether upon the division’s own motion or upon complaint, involving the rates or practices of any public utility, the division may disallow the inclusion in the accounts of a public utility of any payments or compensation to an affiliate for any services rendered, or property furnished, under existing contracts or arrangements with an affiliate unless the public utility shall establish the reasonableness of the payment or compensation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-32

.

39-3-33.
Rules of division.

The division shall make such reasonable rules as will aid in the administration and enforcement of chapters 1 — 5 of this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 64; P.L. 1936, ch. 2345, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-33

; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-3-34.
Utilities to which restrictions apply.

Sections

39-3-15

—

39-3-33

shall apply only to public utilities as defined in §

39-1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2438, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 61; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-34

.

39-3-35.
Municipal rights and franchises subject to regulation.

Every franchise granted to any public utility by any town or city and all contracts, ordinances, rules, regulations, and orders entered into or made by any town or city regulating the use and enjoyment of rights and franchises granted to any public utility or regulating, restricting, or affecting the operation of transit vehicles, under the provisions of any general or special law, shall be subject to the continuing control of the division in the exercise of the powers enumerated in chapters 1 — 5 of this title, and during the existence thereof, every franchise, contract, ordinance, rule, regulation, and order shall be deemed to include, and be subject to, the exercise by the division of any and all of the powers or regulations provided for in chapters 1 — 5 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 51; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 51; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

39-3-35

; P.L. 1959, ch. 144, § 2.

39-3-36.
Notice of railroad hearing.

On any matter pertaining to railroad clearances, or on any matter wherein the safety of railroad train personnel is concerned, the public utilities administrator shall, at least ten (10) days before the date of the hearing on the matter or matters, serve a notice of the time and place of the hearing by mailing a registered letter, postage prepaid, to the Rhode Island state representative of the legislative board of the united transportation union. To effectuate the purpose of this section, it shall be the duty of the united transportation union to notify the division, in writing, of the name and address of the state representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 37, § 1.

39-3-37.
Public utilities — Informational mailings.

All public utilities shall include with their mailings to customers any information relating to public utility rates and services as is required from time to time by the commission, which shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 245, § 1.

39-3-37.1.
Conservation notice on water bills.

Every person or corporation who or that shall charge for the use of water furnished to any house, building, tenement, or estate shall conspicuously display upon the bill or statement for such water charges, the telephone number and address of a public agency designated for the purpose of providing information to the consumer on the conservation of water; provided, further, that once each calendar year, information relating to the conservation of water shall be furnished on the bill to all consumers who are charged for the use of water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 416, § 1.

39-3-37.2.
Informational notice on electric bills.

Every person or corporation who or that shall charge for the use of electricity furnished to any house, building, tenement, or estate shall conspicuously display upon the bill or statement for such electricity charges, the following information:

The total number of kilowatt hours consumed;

The base rate amount for the hours;

Capacity cost adjustment;

Fuel adjustment charge;

Conservation costs;

All applicable credits;

Applicable streetlight rental costs;

Applicable taxes; and

All other costs, charges, or fees added to the bill or statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 232, § 1.

39-3-37.3.
Informational notice on electric bills — Electric distribution company.

Every electric distribution company that shall charge for the distribution of electricity to any house, building, tenement, or estate shall conspicuously display upon the bill or statement for any customer the following information:

The total number of kilowatt hours consumed;

The total cost of distributing the consumer power to the customer;

Transition charges;

Conservation costs;

The total cost of transmitting the consumed power to the appropriate distribution site;

All applicable credits;

Applicable streetlight rental costs;

Applicable taxes;

The cost of power delivered; and

All other costs, charges, or fees added to the bill or statement.

The electric distribution company shall issue a single bill for electric service to all customers in its service territory; provided however, that customers of nonregulated power producers may request that the nonregulated power producers provide separate bills for electricity supply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 357, § 4.

39-3-38.
Wholesale contracts for the sale of water — Rates or charges.

The authority of any public waterworks or water service owned or furnished by any city, town, water district, fire district, or any other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation to enter into contracts with each other for the sale of water at wholesale is hereby confirmed, and the wholesale contracts shall be exempt from the provisions of §

39-3-24(1)

but shall be filed with the division; provided, however, that whenever any public waterworks or water service owned or furnished by any city, town, water district, fire district, or any other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation shall enter into wholesale contracts with each other, the fair wholesale rates or charges for the quantity of water taken shall be for such times and at such rates fixed to continue during such periods as may be mutually agreed upon, or in default of agreement, as shall be determined by the commission in accordance with the provisions of §§

39-3-10

and

39-3-11

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 138, § 1.

39-3-38.1.
Rate adjustments — Purchase and sale of water between regulated water-supply boards.

Regulated water-supply boards that purchase wholesale water from another regulated water-supply board may impose a retail rate increase provided the public utilities commission has approved the wholesale rate increase. The total amount of the retail rate so imposed shall not exceed the amount of the wholesale rate increase. The proposed retail rate increase to be applied by the wholesale purchaser shall be submitted no less than thirty (30) days prior to its effective date to the public utilities commission for its review and approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 303, § 1.

39-3-39.
Purchase of power from small production facilities by electric utilities.

The public utilities commission shall require that all electric utilities subject to the “Third supplementary decision and order” in that matter entitled “In Re: Arrangements between electric utilities and qualifying cogeneration and small power production facilities” Docket No. 1549 before the public utilities commission purchase additional power from small production facilities at the ceiling price established by each utility pursuant to the decision and order. The electric utilities subject to the decision and order shall purchase power under a standard contract and at the ceiling price from qualifying cogeneration facilities and qualifying small power production facilities, as defined in the Public Utilities Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (“PURPA”) (16 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.) with a capacity of ten megawatts (10 MW) or less that are located in the state. The electric utilities to the public utilities third supplementary decision and order issued in Docket No. 1549 shall not be required to enter into agreements at the ceiling price for more than two and one-half percent (21/2%) of its peak load during the prior year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 49, § 2.

39-3-40.
Storage, transportation, and distribution of gas — Regulation — Penalties.

In regulating the storage, transportation, and distribution of gas, and the pressure under which these operations may respectively be carried on, the division of public utilities and carriers may ascertain, determine, and fix adequate and serviceable standards for the measurement of quality, pressure, or other condition pertaining to the performing of its service, or to the furnishing of its product or commodity, by any gas storage, transportation, and distribution facility, and prescribe reasonable regulations for examination and testing of such service, product, or commodity.

Any person, firm, or corporation who or that violates any provision of any code adopted by the division pertaining to the safety of pipeline facilities and the transportation of gas, or of any regulation or rule thereunder, at a time when the division has submitted to and has in effect the annual certification from the United States Secretary of Transportation provided for in § 5(a) of the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, as amended (see § 60101 et seq. of Title 49 of the United States Code), shall be subject to civil penalties as specified in 49 U.S.C. § 60122(a), as amended. To provide adequate protection against risks to life and property posed by pipeline transportation and pipeline facilities, the division shall possess the authority to adopt any of the safety standards for pipeline transportation and for pipeline facilities that are contained in 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.

Any such penalty shall be determined by the division. In determining the amount of the penalty, the appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business of the person, firm, or corporation charged; the gravity of the violation; and the good faith of the person, firm, or corporation charged in attempting to achieve compliance after notification of a violation; shall be considered. The amount of the penalty, where finally determined, may be deducted from any sums that the state may owe to the person, firm, or corporation charged or may be recovered in a civil action commenced in the state courts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 17.

39-3-41.
Regulations for pay-per-call services.

The commission may promulgate reasonable regulations concerning the offering of pay-per-call services to customers within the state. The regulations may include advertising standards, conditions under which charges for “pay-per-call services” may be adjusted or waived along with other restrictions or requirements that the commission determines are necessary to protect consumers’ reasonable access to “pay-per-call services.”

For the purposes of this section, “pay-per-call service” means any passive, interactive, polling, conference, or other similar audiotext service that is accessed by telephone, through a 900 area or exchange code or otherwise, and generates a service-related fee billed to a telephone customer via a telephone common carrier or local exchange telephone company in the customer’s normal monthly bill for telephone service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 389, § 1.

39-3-42.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 171, effective July 1, 1995.

39-3-43.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 227, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 227, § 2.

39-3-44.
Payment of public utility bills.

All bills issued by a public utility as defined in §

39-1-2

shall be deemed paid upon the receipt of sufficient funds by an agent of the public utility authorized to accept such payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 175, § 1.